Washington statutes.
RCW 35.83.040

Agreements as to payments by housing authority.

In connection with any housing project located wholly or partly within the area in which it is authorized to act, any state public body may agree with a housing authority or the federal government that a certain sum (in no event to exceed the amount last levied as the annual tax of such state public body upon the property included in said project prior to the time of its acquisition by the housing authority) or that no sum, shall be paid by the authority in lieu of taxes for any year or period of years.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.83.040. Prior: 1939 c 24 s 5; RRS s 6889-35. Formerly RCW 74.28.040.]